North Carolina, session 2025, HB1190.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Program Established; Purpose. – There is established the Master's
League Athlete Mindset Advantage Pilot Program (Program) for the 2026-2027 school year. The
purpose of the Program is to promote mental performance, emotional wellness, and resilience
among student-athletes through a structured, preventative model of support. The Program shall
provide mandatory mindset and wellness sessions, coordinated support services, and
collaboration among mental health professionals, coaches, physicians, and athlete mentors to
equip student-athletes with strategies to manage stress, strengthen coping skills, improve
performance readiness, and support overall well-being
SECTION 1.(b) Participating Schools. – The following schools may elect to
participate in the Program:
(1) West Forsyth High School.
(2) Ronald Wilson Reagan High School.
(3) Mount Tabor High School.
SECTION 1.(c) Program Structure. – The Program shall consist of at least the
following components:
(1) Mandatory participation in mindset sessions for all student athletes at each
participating school that elects to participate in the Program.
(2) Two mindset sessions per academic quarter, totaling eight sessions.
a. Mindset sessions shall be led by mental health professionals.
b. Subject to parental approval, one-on-one sessions for support when
needed.
SECTION 1.(d) Surveys. – The Masters League shall administer anonymous
surveys throughout the course of the Program. The surveys shall be completed by student-athletes
at intervals determined by the program and shall not collect personally identifiable student
information. The Masters League shall compile and maintain aggregated survey results and shall
submit those results to Winston-Salem/Forsyth County Schools for evaluation purposes. Both
Winston-Salem/Forsyth County Schools and the Masters League may use the aggregated results
to assess program effectiveness, identify areas for improvement, and measure student-athlete
outcomes. Surveys shall assess at least the following:
a. Whether the athlete's self-reported mental health has improved.
*H1190-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Whether the athlete used mental health resources outside of those
offered as part of the Program.
c. Coping or emotional regulation strategies used by the athlete.
SECTION 1.(e) Report. – Winston-Salem/Forsyth County Schools shall report to
the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the aggregated results of surveys
administered pursuant to subsection (d) of this section and the following:
(1) How Program funds were spent.
(2) A detailed description of how the Program functioned in practice.
(3) Recommendations regarding expanding the Program into future school years
or additional schools.
(4) Recommendations for changes to the Program.
SECTION 1.(f) Appropriation. – There is appropriated to the Department of Public
Instruction the sum of one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to The Master's League Foundation for
Boys, Inc., to implement the Program. Funds appropriated in this section shall be used for costs
associated with the implementation and administration of the Program, including mandatory
mindset and wellness sessions, professional services, program coordination, athlete mentor
support, evaluation, administrative expenses, and other costs necessary to carry out the Program.
Up to thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) appropriated in this section may be used for costs
associated with securing and operating an off-site facility for the Program.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 House Bill 1190-First Edition